Maine, session 132, LD1918.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 16 MRSA §703, sub-§2, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 267, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
G. Information disclosing that a criminal charge has been dismissed by a court with
prejudice or dismissed with finality by a prosecutor other than as part of a plea
agreement in which the defendant pleads guilty to and is convicted of another criminal
charge. If a defendant admits to and is adjudicated as having committed a civil
violation or a traffic infraction as part of a plea agreement, but does not also plead
guilty to and is not also convicted of a criminal charge as part of that agreement,
information disclosing that a criminal charge has been dismissed by a court with
prejudice or dismissed with finality by a prosecutor as part of that agreement is
confidential criminal history record information;
Sec. 2. 16 MRSA §705, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Charges dismissed as result of deferred disposition. Notwithstanding any
provision of this chapter to the contrary and subject to the Maine Rules of Evidence,
including rules regarding relevancy, a party may introduce in any civil or criminal
proceeding evidence that a defendant pled guilty to a crime as part of a deferred disposition
for purposes of establishing that the defendant admitted to committing that crime, even if,
after the defendant complied with the court-imposed deferment requirements, the
defendant's guilty plea was later withdrawn and the underlying criminal charge was
dismissed by the court with prejudice.